Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2403
Provisions applicable.

A credit card bank shall be subject to the Interstate Branching and Merger Act, the Nebraska Bank
Holding Company Act of 1995, the Nebraska Banking Act, and Chapter 8, articles
5, 6, 7, 8, 13, 14, 15, 16, 19, and 20, unless otherwise limited or excluded
or the context otherwise requires.

Laws 2004, LB 999, § 19;

Laws 2012, LB963, § 21.

Interstate Branching and Merger Act, see section 8-2101.

Nebraska Bank Holding Company Act of 1995, see section 8-908.

Nebraska Banking Act, see section 8-101.01.